en: Coppata pancetta
it: Pancetta coppata

en: Steccata pancetta
it: Pancetta steccata

en: Stufata pancetta
it: Pancetta stufata

en: Tesa pancetta
it: Pancetta tesa

en: salt-cured pork belly, Pork belly salt-cured
fr: poitrine de porc demi-sel

en: Frozen pork belly
fr: Poitrine de porc surgelée

en: Pork loin
bg: Свинско филе
es: Lomo de cerdo
fr: Longe de porc
hr: Lungić
ja: 豚ロース

en: Frozen pork loin
fr: Longe de porc surgelée

en: Cured pork loin, Lomo
es: Lomo
fr: Lomo
hr: Sušeni lungić

en: Lomo embuchado
es: Lomo embuchado
fr: Lomo embuchado
hr: Lomo embuchado

en: Lomo Ibérico
es: Lomo Ibérico
fr: Lomo ibérique, lomo Ibérico
hr: Lomo ibérico

en: Lomo Ibérico bellota
es: Lomo Ibérico bellota
fr: Lomo Ibérico bellota, lomo de bellota
hr: Lomo ibérico bellota

en: Saxe fillet, York fillet
fr: Filet de saxe

en: Pork round steak
fr: Rouelle de porc

en: Pork tenderloin lean
fr: filet de porc

en: Frozen pork tenderloin lean
fr: Filet de porc surgelé

en: Pork eye of shortloin
fr: filet de porc rôti avec chaînette

en: Pork filet mignon
fr: filet mignon de porc

en: Smoked pork filet mignon
fr: Filets mignons de porc fumés, Filet mignon de porc fumé

en: Pork 90/10 trimming
fr: Porc maigre 90/10